Maryland, session 2025, HB0771.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–402.1.
BEGINNING IN THE 2027–2028 SCHOOL YEAR, EACH STUDENT ENROLLED IN A
PUBLIC ELEMENTARY OR SECONDARY SCHOOL IN THE STATE SHALL SUBMIT TO THE
SCHOOL A CERTIFICATE OF DENTAL HEALTH IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE PROGRAM
FOR STUDENT DENTAL HEALTH ESTABLISHED UNDER § 20–2302 OF THE HEALTH –
GENERAL ARTICLE, ON A SCHEDULE ESTABLISHED BY THE DEPARTMENT.
4–111.2.
The Department shall:
(1) Support and facilitate oral health education, including oral disease
prevention and dental health promotion, in every county;
(2) Develop a process to monitor implementation of oral health education;
[and]
(3) SUPPORT AND FACILITATE EACH COUNTY BOARD IN PUBLISHING
INFORMATION ON STUDENT DENTAL HEALTH THAT IS CREATED BY THE PROGRAM
FOR STUDENT DENTAL HEALTH UNDER § 20–2302 OF THE HEALTH – GENERAL
ARTICLE ON THE LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM’S WEBSITE AND IN STUDENT HANDBOOKS;
AND
[(3)] (4) On or before December 1, 2015, and every 5 years thereafter,
submit to the Governor and, subject to § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the
General Assembly a summary of the information reported by the Department to the State
Superintendent during the certification of the Health Education State Curriculum.
Article – Health – General
Subtitle 23. [Plain Language] Dental HEALTH [Information] PROGRAMS.
20–2302.

HOUSE BILL 771 3
(A) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH A PROGRAM FOR STUDENT
DENTAL HEALTH.
(B) THE DEPARTMENT’S PROGRAM SHALL INCLUDE:
(1) STANDARDS FOR THE RECOMMENDED PERIODIC DENTAL
EXAMINATIONS OF STUDENTS; AND
(2) THE CREATION OF A CERTIFICATE OF DENTAL HEALTH THAT CAN
BE USED BY PUBLIC SCHOOLS IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 7–402.1 OF THE EDUCATION
ARTICLE;
(3) THE CREATION OF A STANDARD FORM TO BE USED BY HEALTH
CARE PRACTITIONERS, PARENTS, AND SCHOOLS TO CERTIFY A STUDENT’S DENTAL
HEALTH; AND
(4) INFORMATION FOR STUDENTS AND PARENTS ON:
(I) HOW TO FIND INSURANCE THAT WILL COVER DENTAL
HEALTH CARE;
(II) LISTS OF PEDIATRIC DENTISTS LOCATED IN AREAS
DIFFERENT REGIONS OF THE STATE; AND
(III) THE IMPORTANCE OF DENTAL HEALTH TO A STUDENT’S
OVERALL HEALTH AND WELL–BEING.
(C) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL IMPLEMENT ITS PROGRAM ON A SCHEDULE
THAT ALLOWS EACH STUDENT TO SUBMIT A CERTIFICATE OF DENTAL HEALTH TO
THE STUDENT’S PUBLIC SCHOOL BEGINNING IN THE 2027–2028 SCHOOL YEAR, IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 7–402.1 OF THE EDUCATION ARTICLE.
(D) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS
SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.